Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.040

Acquisition authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or chapter 39.32 RCW, the state superintendent of public instruction is hereby authorized to purchase, or otherwise acquire from the government of the United States or any property or commodity disposal agency thereof, surplus or donated food commodities for the use by any school district for their hot lunch program.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.010. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.30.010, 28.30.010.]